Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Annual Reports and License Taxes

Law reviews. —

For article, “An Analysis of Recent Tax Proposals in Wyoming,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 479 (1968).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 278 to 354; 19 Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 2401, 2402, 2514.

§ 17-16-1630.
Filing of reports and payment of tax required; amount of tax; exemptions; records.

Every corporation organized under the laws of this state and every foreign corporation which obtains the right to transact and carry on business within this state (except banks, insurance companies and savings and loan associations) shall file with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the month of registration of every year a certification, under the penalty of perjury, by its treasurer or other fiscal agent setting forth its capital, property and assets located and employed in the state of Wyoming. The statement shall give the names and addresses of its officers and directors and the address of its principal office. On or before the first day of the month of registration of every year the corporation shall pay to the secretary of state in addition to all other statutory taxes and fees a license tax based upon the sum of its capital, property and assets reported, of sixty dollars ($60.00) or two-tenths of one mill on the dollar ($.0002), whichever is greater.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 35, § 2.

The provisions of W.S. 17-16-1630(a) shall be modified as follows:

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 35, § 2.

Any corporation engaged in the public calling of carrying goods, passengers or information interstate is not required to comply with the provisions of W.S. 17-16-1630(a) except to the extent of capital, property and assets used in intrastate business in this state;

The value of all mines and mining claims from which gold, silver and other precious metals, soda, saline, coal, mineral oil or other valuable deposit, is or shall be produced is deemed equivalent to the assessed value of the gross product thereof, for the previous year;

The assessed value of any property shall be its actual value.

Financial information in the annual report shall be current as of the end of the corporation’s fiscal year immediately preceding the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the corporation. All other information in the annual report shall be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the corporation.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the secretary of state shall promptly notify the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing and return the report to it for correction.

Every corporation registered or authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming shall preserve for three (3) years at its principal place of business, suitable records and books as may be necessary to determine the amount of tax for which it is liable for under this act. All records and books shall be available for examination by the secretary of state or his designee during regular business hours except as arranged by mutual consent.

In addition to other fees provided under this section, each corporation shall pay one hundred dollars ($100.00), except for foreign corporations which shall pay one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00), to the secretary of state for initial incorporation or qualification to do business in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 117, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 28-1001; C.S. 1945, § 44-401; W.S. 1957, § 17-46; W.S. 1977, §

17-2-101

; Laws 1980, ch. 50, § 2; 1981, ch. 47, § 1; 1987, ch. 174, § 1; 1989, ch. 249, § 2; 1991, ch. 104, § 1; 1993, ch. 146, § 3; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2000, ch. 35, §§ 1, 2; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "sixty dollars ($60.00)" for "fifty dollars ($50.00)" in the last sentence of (a); and added ", except for foreign corporations which shall pay one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00)," in (f).

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

Cross references. —

As to perjury in judicial, legislative or administrative proceedings, see §

6-5-301

.

As to fee collection duties of department of revenue, see §

39-11-102

Cited

in

Lusk Lumber Co. v. Independent Producers Consol., 43 Wyo. 191, 299 P. 1044,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1931).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Partnership Taxation & The Limited Liability Company: Check Out the Check-the-Box Entity Classification,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 831 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of Uniform Division of Income for Tax Purposes Act, 8 ALR4th 934.

§§ 17-16-1631 through 17-16-1633.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 192, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 117, § 2 and Laws 1993, Sp. Sess., ch. 59, §§ 1 and 2, related to the forfeiture of a domestic corporation's charter and a foreign corporation's right to do business for failure to file the annual report and/or to pay the license tax, and to the procedure for reinstatement of rights.

Prospective application. —

Laws 1997, ch. 192, § 5, provides: “A domestic corporation or foreign corporation whose certificate of incorporation or right to carry on business in this state has been forfeited pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1631

or

17-19-1631

prior to the effective date of this act shall be entitled to apply for reinstatement of its certificate or right to carry on business in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 17-16-1632 and 17-16-1633 and 17-19-1632 and 17-19-1633 prior to their repeal by this act.”